Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-417
Court-martial, defined; jurisdiction.

There shall be general, special, and summary courts-martial constituted like similar courts of the Army and Air Force of the United States. The jurisdiction of the courts-martial shall be as follows:

(1) General court-martial: Except as otherwise provided by law, a general court-martial may try any person subject to the Nebraska Code of Military Justice;

(2) Special court-martial: Except as otherwise provided by law, a special court-martial may try any person subject to the code when the punishment for the offense does not include a dishonorable discharge; and

(3) Summary court-martial: Except as otherwise provided by law, a summary court-martial may try any person subject to the code and it may adjudge any punishment not forbidden by the code except dishonorable discharge or bad-conduct discharge, confinement for more than one month, hard labor without confinement for more than forty-five days, or forfeiture of more than two-thirds of one month's pay.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 17, p. 1561;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 6.